Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2291.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1223-A of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1223-A. Licensing of retailers.[Applicants] (a) Requirements prior to 2027.--On or before December 31, 2026, applicants for a retail license or renewal of that license shall meet the following requirements:(1) The premises in which the applicant proposes to conduct business are adequate to protect the revenues.12345678910111213141516171819202122 (2) The applicant shall not have failed to disclose any material information required by the department.(3) The applicant shall not have any material false statement in the application.(4) The applicant shall not have violated any provision of this article.(5) The applicant shall have filed all required State tax reports and paid any State taxes not subject to a timely perfected administrative or judicial appeal or subject to a duly authorized deferred payment plan.(b) Requirements subsequent to 2026.--On or after January 1, 2027, applicants for a retail license or renewal of that license shall meet the following requirements:(1) The premises in which the applicant proposes to conduct business are adequate to protect the revenues. The premises shall not be located within 1,000 feet of the property line of a public, private or parochial school.(2) The applicant shall not have failed to disclose any material information required by the department.(3) The applicant shall not have any material false statement in the application.(4) The applicant shall not have violated any provision of this article.(5) The applicant shall have filed all required State tax reports and paid any State taxes not subject to a timely perfected administrative or judicial appeal or subject to a duly authorized deferred payment plan.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2291PN3001 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728